Idaho, session 2025, S1130.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Military Division the following amounts
to be expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MILITARY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $16,100 $16,100
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $139,300 501,000 640,300
TOTAL $139,300 $517,100 $656,400
II. OFFICE OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $50,100 $50,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 8,600,000 8,600,000
TOTAL $50,100 $8,600,000 $8,650,100
GRAND TOTAL $139,300 $50,100 $517,100 $8,600,000 $9,306,500


SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other appropriation provided by law
to the contrary, the appropriation made to the Military Division is hereby
reduced according to the designated programs and expense classes from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MILITARY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $50,100 50,100
II. FEDERAL/STATE AGREEMENTS:
FROM:
Federal Grant
Fund $139,300 $139,300
GRAND TOTAL $139,300 $50,100 $189,400
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Military Division and
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $8,600,000 from the State
Emergency Relief Fund to the Miscellaneous Revenue Fund as soon as practica-
ble for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Such moneys shall be
used for hazardous materials regional response.
SECTION 4. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 81, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Military Division for the Military Management
Program $540,000 for operating expenditures from the General Fund for the
purpose of Public Safety Communications support for the period July 1, 2024,
through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 5. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 81, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Military Division for the Military Management
Program $759,200 for operating expenditures from the General Fund for the
purpose of upgrading the division's IT infrastructure and licensing for the
period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 6. There is hereby appropriated to the Military Division and
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $34,200 from the General
Fund to the Hazardous Substance Emergency Response Fund as soon as practica-
ble for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025. Such moneys shall be
used to reimburse costs incurred by the Office of Emergency Management Pro-
gram in the Military Division pursuant to Section 39-7110, Idaho Code.


SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 4, 5, and 6 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.